Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6898YC (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 669.14A, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The right, privilege, or immunity secured by law , 3 including by the Constitution of the State of Iowa, statute, 4 or common law, was not clearly established at the time of the 5 alleged deprivation, or at the time of the alleged deprivation 6 the state of the law was not sufficiently clear that every 7 reasonable employee would have understood that the conduct 8 alleged constituted a violation of law. 9 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 10 retroactively to claims brought on or after June 17, 2021. 11